Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 620 Dependency, Neglect, and Abuse
620.050.
Immunity for good-faith actions or reports — Investigations — Confidentiality of reports — Exceptions — Parent’s access to records — Sharing of information by children’s advocacy centers — Confidentiality of interview with child — Exceptions — Confidentiality of identifying information regarding reporting individual — Internal review and report — Waiver — Medical diagnostic procedures — Sharing information with relatives — Interaction among siblings who are not jointly placed.

Anyone acting upon reasonable cause in the making of a report or acting under KRS

620.030

to

620.050

in good faith shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any such participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from such report or action. However, any person who knowingly makes a false report and does so with malice shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any employee or designated agent of a children’s advocacy center shall be immune from any civil liability arising from performance within the scope of the person’s duties as provided in KRS

620.030

to

620.050

. Any such person shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding. Nothing in this subsection shall limit liability for negligence. Upon the request of an employee or designated agent of a children’s advocacy center, the Attorney General shall provide for the defense of any civil action brought against the employee or designated agent as provided under KRS

12.211

to

12.215

.

Neither the husband-wife nor any professional-client/patient privilege, except the attorney-client and clergy-penitent privilege, shall be a ground for refusing to report under this section or for excluding evidence regarding a dependent, neglected, or abused child or the cause thereof, in any judicial proceedings resulting from a report pursuant to this section. This subsection shall also apply in any criminal proceeding in District or Circuit Court regarding a dependent, neglected, or abused child.

Upon receipt of a report of an abused, neglected, or dependent child pursuant to this chapter, the cabinet as the designated agency or its delegated representative shall initiate a prompt investigation or assessment of family needs, take necessary action, and shall offer protective services toward safeguarding the welfare of the child. The cabinet shall work toward preventing further dependency, neglect, or abuse of the child or any other child under the same care, and preserve and strengthen family life, where possible, by enhancing parental capacity for adequate child care.

The report of suspected child abuse, neglect, or dependency and all information obtained by the cabinet or its delegated representative, as a result of an investigation or assessment made pursuant to this chapter, except for those records provided for in subsection (6) of this section, shall not be divulged to anyone except:

Persons suspected of causing dependency, neglect, or abuse;

The custodial parent or legal guardian of the child alleged to be dependent, neglected, or abused;

Persons within the cabinet with a legitimate interest or responsibility related to the case;

A licensed child-caring facility or child-placing agency evaluating placement for or serving a child who is believed to be the victim of an abuse, neglect, or dependency report;

Other medical, psychological, educational, or social service agencies, child care administrators, corrections personnel, or law enforcement agencies, including the county attorney’s office, the coroner, and the local child fatality response team, that have a legitimate interest in the case;

A noncustodial parent when the dependency, neglect, or abuse is substantiated;

Members of multidisciplinary teams as defined by KRS

620.020

and which operate pursuant to KRS

431.600

;

Employees or designated agents of a children’s advocacy center;

Those persons so authorized by court order; or

The external child fatality and near fatality review panel established by KRS

620.055

.

Files, reports, notes, photographs, records, electronic and other communications, and working papers used or developed by a children’s advocacy center in providing services under this chapter are confidential and shall not be disclosed except to the following persons:

Staff employed by the cabinet, law enforcement officers, and Commonwealth’s and county attorneys who are directly involved in the investigation or prosecution of the case, including a cabinet investigation or assessment of child abuse, neglect, and dependency in accordance with this chapter;

Medical and mental health professionals listed by name in a release of information signed by the guardian of the child, provided that the information shared is limited to that necessary to promote the physical or psychological health of the child or to treat the child for abuse-related symptoms;

The court and those persons so authorized by a court order;

The external child fatality and near fatality review panel established by KRS

620.055

; and

The parties to an administrative hearing conducted by the cabinet or its designee in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B in an appeal of a cabinet-substantiated finding of abuse or neglect. The children’s advocacy center may, in its sole discretion, provide testimony in lieu of files, reports, notes, photographs, records, electronic and other communications, and working papers used or developed by the center if the center determines that the release poses a threat to the safety or well-being of the child, or would be in the best interests of the child. Following the administrative hearing and any judicial review, the parties to the administrative hearing shall return all files, reports, notes, photographs, records, electronic and other communications, and working papers used or developed by the children’s advocacy center to the center.

The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as to contravene the Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to discovery.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a parent or guardian from accessing records for his or her child providing that the parent or guardian is not currently under investigation by a law enforcement agency or the cabinet relating to the abuse or neglect of a child.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit employees or designated agents of a children’s advocacy center from disclosing information during a multidisciplinary team review of a child sexual abuse case as set forth under KRS

620.040

. Persons receiving this information shall sign a confidentiality statement consistent with statutory prohibitions on disclosure of this information.

Employees or designated agents of a children’s advocacy center may confirm to another children’s advocacy center that a child has been seen for services. If an information release has been signed by the guardian of the child, a children’s advocacy center may disclose relevant information to another children’s advocacy center.

An interview of a child recorded at a children’s advocacy center shall not be duplicated, except that the Commonwealth’s or county attorney prosecuting the case may:

Make and retain one (1) copy of the interview; and

Make one (1) copy for the defendant’s or respondent’s counsel that the defendant’s or respondent’s counsel shall not duplicate.

The defendant’s or respondent’s counsel shall file the copy with the court clerk at the close of the case.

Unless objected to by the victim or victims, the court, on its own motion, or on motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth shall order all recorded interviews that are introduced into evidence or are in the possession of the children’s advocacy center, law enforcement, the prosecution, or the court to be sealed.

The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as to contravene the Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to discovery.

Identifying information concerning the individual initiating the report under KRS

620.030

shall not be disclosed except:

To law enforcement officials that have a legitimate interest in the case;

To the agency designated by the cabinet to investigate or assess the report;

To members of multidisciplinary teams as defined by KRS

620.020

that operated under KRS

431.600

Under a court order, after the court has conducted an in camera review of the record of the state related to the report and has found reasonable cause to believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report; or

The external child fatality and near fatality review panel established by KRS

620.055

.

Information may be publicly disclosed by the cabinet in a case where child abuse or neglect has resulted in a child fatality or near fatality.

The cabinet shall conduct an internal review of any case where child abuse or neglect has resulted in a child fatality or near fatality and the cabinet had prior involvement with the child or family. The cabinet shall prepare a summary that includes an account of:

The cabinet’s actions and any policy or personnel changes taken or to be taken, including the results of appeals, as a result of the findings from the internal review; and

Any cooperation, assistance, or information from any agency of the state or any other agency, institution, or facility providing services to the child or family that were requested and received by the cabinet during the investigation of a child fatality or near fatality.

The cabinet shall submit a report by September 1 of each year containing an analysis of all summaries of internal reviews occurring during the previous year and an analysis of historical trends to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the state child fatality review team created under KRS

211.684

.

When an adult who is the subject of information made confidential by subsection (5) of this section publicly reveals or causes to be revealed any significant part of the confidential matter or information, the confidentiality afforded by subsection (5) of this section is presumed voluntarily waived, and confidential information and records about the person making or causing the public disclosure, not already disclosed but related to the information made public, may be disclosed if disclosure is in the best interest of the child or is necessary for the administration of the cabinet’s duties under this chapter.

As a result of any report of suspected child abuse or neglect, photographs and X-rays or other appropriate medical diagnostic procedures may be taken or caused to be taken, without the consent of the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, as a part of the medical evaluation or investigation of these reports. These photographs and X-rays or results of other medical diagnostic procedures may be introduced into evidence in any subsequent judicial proceedings or an administrative hearing conducted by the cabinet or its designee in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B in an appeal of a cabinet-substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect. The person performing the diagnostic procedures or taking photographs or X-rays shall be immune from criminal or civil liability for having performed the act. Nothing herein shall limit liability for negligence.

In accordance with 42

U.S.C. sec. 671

, the cabinet shall share information about a child in the custody of the cabinet with a relative or a parent of the child’s sibling for the purposes of:

Evaluating or arranging a placement for the child;

Arranging appropriate treatment services for the child; or

Establishing visitation between the child and a relative, including a sibling of the child.

In accordance with 42

U.S.C. sec. 671

, the cabinet shall, in the case of siblings removed from their home who are not jointly placed, provide for frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless the cabinet determines that frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 66, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 45, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 18, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 347, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 57, § 19, effective March 17, 1998; 1998, ch. 303, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 144, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 164, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 87, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 169, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2013, ch. 39, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 115, § 6, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 159, § 19, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

620.051.
Background check of child abuse and neglect records — Fee — Central registry — Administrative regulations.

The cabinet may charge a fee of ten dollars ($10) per background check of the cabinet’s child abuse and neglect records when those services are requested by a person for professional, trade, or commercial purposes or for personal use.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish the central registry and the process for a background check of the cabinet’s child abuse and neglect records.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 159, § 18, effective July 14, 2018.

620.052.
Provision of information to parent or legal guardian concerning community service programs for families in crisis when child protection investigation does not result in out-of-home placement of a child.

During a child protection investigation that does not result in an out-of-home placement due to abuse of a child, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services is authorized and encouraged to provide information to the parent or legal guardian about community service programs that provide support services for families in crisis, including organizations that operate programs authorized under KRS

403.352

and

403.353

. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services is authorized to exercise its discretion in recommending programs, organizations, and resources to the parent or legal guardian.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 107, § 3, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 107, sec. 3 directed that a new section of KRS Chapter 403 be created for the text of this statute. The subject matter of KRS Chapter 403 relates to divorce and dissolution of marriage. Since this statute addresses an option for the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to follow at the conclusion of a child protection investigation that does not result in removing a child from the parent or legal guardian's home, in codification the Reviser of Statutes created a new section of KRS Chapter 620, which addresses child abuse and neglect investigations, as a more appropriate statutory designation under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(a).

620.055.
External child fatality and near fatality review panel — Creation — Members — Meetings — Duties — Responsibilities — Information required to be provided to members — Report and response — Annual reports — Confidentiality — Destruction of information following conclusion of panel’s examination — Application of open records and open meetings law — Limitation of liability — Proceedings are privileged — Annual evaluation of panel’s work. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

An external child fatality and near fatality review panel is hereby created and established for the purpose of conducting comprehensive reviews of child fatalities and near fatalities, reported to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, suspected to be a result of abuse or neglect. The panel shall be attached to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for staff and administrative purposes.

The external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall be composed of the following five (5) ex officio nonvoting members and seventeen (17) voting members:

Two (2) members of the Kentucky General Assembly, one (1) appointed by the President of the Senate and one (1) appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, who shall be ex officio nonvoting members;

The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services, who shall be an ex officio nonvoting member;

The commissioner of the Department for Public Health, who shall be an ex officio nonvoting member;

A family court judge selected by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court, who shall be an ex officio nonvoting member;

A pediatrician from the University of Kentucky’s Department of Pediatrics who is licensed and experienced in forensic medicine relating to child abuse and neglect to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the dean of the University of Kentucky School of Medicine;

A pediatrician from the University of Louisville’s Department of Pediatrics who is licensed and experienced in forensic medicine relating to child abuse and neglect to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the dean of the University of Louisville School of Medicine;

The state medical examiner or designee;

A court-appointed special advocate (CASA) program director to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky CASA Association;

A peace officer with experience investigating child abuse and neglect fatalities and near fatalities to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the commissioner of the Kentucky State Police;

A representative from Prevent Child Abuse Kentucky, Inc. to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the president of the Prevent Child Abuse Kentucky, Inc. board of directors;

A practicing local prosecutor to be selected by the Attorney General;

The executive director of the Kentucky Domestic Violence Association or the executive director’s designee;

The chairperson of the State Child Fatality Review Team established in accordance with KRS

211.684

or the chairperson’s designee;

A practicing social work clinician to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Board of Social Work;

A practicing addiction counselor to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky Association of Addiction Professionals;

A representative from the family resource and youth service centers to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

A representative of a community mental health center to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky Association of Regional Mental Health and Mental Retardation Programs, Inc.;

A member of a citizen foster care review board selected by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court;

An at-large representative who shall serve as chairperson to be selected by the Secretary of State;

The president of the Kentucky Coroners Association; and

A practicing medication-assisted treatment provider to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure.

By August 1, 2013, the appointing authority or the appointing authorities, as the case may be, shall have appointed panel members. Initial terms of members, other than those serving ex officio, shall be staggered to provide continuity. Initial appointments shall be: five (5) members for terms of one (1) year, five (5) members for terms of two (2) years, and five (5) members for terms of three (3) years, these terms to expire, in each instance, on June 30 and thereafter until a successor is appointed and accepts appointment.

Upon the expiration of these initial staggered terms, successors shall be appointed by the respective appointing authorities, for terms of two (2) years, and until successors are appointed and accept their appointments. Members shall be eligible for reappointment. Vacancies in the membership of the panel shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

At any time, a panel member shall recuse himself or herself from the review of a case if the panel member believes he or she has a personal or private conflict of interest.

If a voting panel member is absent from two (2) or more consecutive, regularly scheduled meetings, the member shall be considered to have resigned and shall be replaced with a new member in the same manner as the original appointment.

If a voting panel member is proven to have violated subsection (13) of this section, the member shall be removed from the panel, and the member shall be replaced with a new member in the same manner as the original appointment.

The panel shall meet at least quarterly and may meet upon the call of the chairperson of the panel.

Members of the panel shall receive no compensation for their duties related to the panel, but may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in accordance with state guidelines and administrative regulations.

Each panel member shall be provided copies of all information set out in this subsection, including but not limited to records and information, upon request, to be gathered, unredacted, and submitted to the panel within thirty (30) days by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services from the Department for Community Based Services or any agency, organization, or entity involved with a child subject to a fatality or near fatality:

Cabinet for Health and Family Services records and documentation regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home, and persons supervising the child at the time of the incident that include all records and documentation set out in this paragraph:

All prior and ongoing investigations, services, or contacts;

Any and all records of services to the family provided by agencies or individuals contracted by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

All documentation of actions taken as a result of child fatality internal reviews conducted pursuant to KRS 620.050(12)(b);

Licensing reports from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Office of Inspector General, if an incident occurred in a licensed facility;

All available records regarding protective services provided out of state;

All records of services provided by the Department for Juvenile Justice regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home, and persons involved with the child at the time of the incident;

Autopsy reports;

Emergency medical service, fire department, law enforcement, coroner, and other first responder reports, including but not limited to photos and interviews with family members and witnesses;

Medical records regarding the deceased or injured child, including but not limited to all records and documentation set out in this paragraph:

Primary care records, including progress notes; developmental milestones; growth charts that include head circumference; all laboratory and X-ray requests and results; and birth record that includes record of delivery type, complications, and initial physical exam of baby;

In-home provider care notes about observations of the family, bonding, others in home, and concerns;

Hospitalization and emergency department records;

Dental records;

Specialist records; and

All photographs of injuries of the child that are available;

Educational records of the deceased or injured child, or other children residing in the home where the incident occurred, including but not limited to the records and documents set out in this paragraph:

Attendance records;

Special education services;

School-based health records; and

Documentation of any interaction and services provided to the children and family.

The release of educational records shall be in compliance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20

U.S.C. sec. 1232

g and its implementing regulations;

Head Start records or records from any other child care or early child care provider;

Records of any Family, Circuit, or District Court involvement with the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home and persons involved with the child at the time of the incident that include but are not limited to the juvenile and family court records and orders set out in this paragraph, pursuant to KRS Chapters 199, 403, 405, 406, and 600 to 645:

Petitions;

Court reports by the Department for Community Based Services, guardian ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and the Citizen Foster Care Review Board;

All orders of the court, including temporary, dispositional, or adjudicatory; and

Documentation of annual or any other review by the court;

Home visit records from the Department for Public Health or other services;

All information on prior allegations of abuse or neglect and deaths of children of adults residing in the household;

All law enforcement records and documentation regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home, and persons involved with the child at the time of the incident; and

Mental health records regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home, and persons involved with the child at the time of the incident.

The panel may seek the advice of experts, such as persons specializing in the fields of psychiatric and forensic medicine, nursing, psychology, social work, education, law enforcement, family law, or other related fields, if the facts of a case warrant additional expertise.

The panel shall post updates after each meeting to the Web site of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet regarding case reviews, findings, and recommendations.

The panel chairperson, or other requested persons, shall report a summary of the panel’s discussions and proposed or actual recommendations to the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare of the Kentucky General Assembly monthly or at the request of a committee co-chair. The goal of the committee shall be to ensure impartiality regarding the operations of the panel during its review process.

The panel shall publish an annual report by February 1 of each year consisting of case reviews, findings, and recommendations for system and process improvements to help prevent child fatalities and near fatalities that are due to abuse and neglect. The report shall be submitted to the Governor, the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, the Attorney General, the State Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Board established pursuant to KRS

15.905

, and the director of the Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee, the Interim Joint Committee on Health, Welfare, and Family Services, and the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary.

The panel shall determine which agency is responsible for implementing each recommendation, and shall forward each recommendation in writing to the appropriate agency.

Any agency that receives a recommendation from the panel shall, within ninety (90) days of receipt:

Respond to the panel with a written notice of intent to implement the recommendation, an explanation of how the recommendation will be implemented, and an approximate time frame of implementation; or

Respond to the panel with a written notice that the agency does not intend to implement the recommendation, and a detailed explanation of why the recommendation cannot be implemented.

Information and record copies that are confidential under state or federal law and are provided to the external child fatality and near fatality review panel by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Department for Community Based Services, or any agency, organization, or entity for review shall not become the information and records of the panel and shall not lose their confidentiality by virtue of the panel’s access to the information and records. The original information and records used to generate information and record copies provided to the panel in accordance with subsection (6) of this section shall be maintained by the appropriate agency in accordance with state and federal law and shall be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

. All open records requests shall be made to the appropriate agency, not to the external child fatality and near fatality review panel or any of the panel members. Information and record copies provided to the panel for review shall be exempt from the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

. At the conclusion of the panel’s examination, all copies of information and records provided to the panel involving an individual case shall be destroyed by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portions of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel meetings during which an individual child fatality or near fatality case is reviewed or discussed by panel members may be a closed session and subject to the provisions of KRS 61.815(1) and shall only occur following the conclusion of an open session. At the conclusion of the closed session, the panel shall immediately convene an open session and give a summary of what occurred during the closed session.

Each member of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel, any person attending a closed panel session, and any person presenting information or records on an individual child fatality or near fatality shall not release information or records not available under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

to the public.

A member of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall not be prohibited from making a good faith report to any state or federal agency of any information or issue that the panel member believes should be reported or disclosed in an effort to facilitate effectiveness and transparency in Kentucky’s child protective services.

A member of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall not be held liable for any civil damages or criminal penalties pursuant to KRS

620.990

as a result of any action taken or omitted in the performance of the member’s duties pursuant to this section and KRS

620.050

, except for violations of subsection (11), (12), or (13) of this section.

The proceedings, records, opinions, and deliberations of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall be privileged and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena, or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal actions in any manner that would directly or indirectly identify specific persons or cases reviewed by the panel. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict or limit the right to discover or use in any civil action any evidence that is discoverable independent of the proceedings of the panel.

The Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee of the Kentucky General Assembly shall conduct an annual evaluation of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel established pursuant to this section to monitor the operations, procedures, and recommendations of the panel and shall report its findings to the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 39, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 159, § 55, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 14, § 10, effective March 12, 2021; 2022 ch. 75, § 18, effective April 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 139, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.